test/src/morphology/N-М_Д-крюк_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
Tests:
# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Noun - крюк M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      крюк+N+Msc+Sg+Nom: крю́к
      крюк+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Inan: крю́к
      крюк+N+Msc+Sg+Gen: крюка́
      крюк+N+Msc+Sg+Loc: крюке́
      крюк+N+Msc+Sg+Loc2: крюку́
      крюк+N+Msc+Sg+Dat: крюку́
      крюк+N+Msc+Sg+Ins: крюко́м
      крюк+N+Msc+Pl+Nom: крю́чья
      крюк+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Inan: крю́чья
      крюк+N+Msc+Pl+Gen: крю́чьев
      крюк+N+Msc+Pl+Loc: крю́чьях
      крюк+N+Msc+Pl+Dat: крю́чьям
      крюк+N+Msc+Pl+Ins: крю́чьями
